tr: Yalıtım durumu: Yalıtımlı; Yalıtımsız; Diğer
fr: Présence d’isolation: Isotherme; Non isotherme; Autre
it: Stato dell'isolamento: Isolato; Non isolato; Altro
hr-HR: Status izolacije: Izolirano; Neizolirano; Ostalo
pt-PT: Estado do isolamento: Isolado; Não isolado; Outro
de: Isolierstatus: Wärmegedämmt; Nicht isoliert; Sonstiges
nl: Isolatiestatus: Met isolatie; Zonder isolatie; Overig
vi: Trạng thái cách điện: Cách nhiệt; Không cách nhiệt; Khác
pt-BR: Status de isolamento: Térmico; Não térmico; Outro
cs: Stav izolace: S izolací; Bez izolace; Jiné
th: สถานะฉนวนกันความร้อน: หุ้มฉนวน; ไม่ได้หุ้มฉนวน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 保溫狀態: 隔熱型; 非隔熱型; 其他
ro-RO: Starea izolației: Izolat; Neizolat; Altele
fi: Eristyksen tila: Eristetty; Eristämätön; Muu
hu: Szigetelési állapot: Hőszigetelt; Nem szigetelt; Egyéb
bg-BG: Състояние на изолацията: Изолирано; Неизолирано; Друго
da: Isoleringsstatus: Isoleret; Ikke-isoleret; Andet
zh-CN: 保温状态: 隔热; 非隔热; 其他
sl-SI: Stanje izolacije: Izolirano; Neizolirano; Druga
el: Κατάσταση μόνωσης: Με μόνωση; Χωρίς μόνωση; Άλλο
ru: Наличие изоляции: С термоизоляцией; Без термоизоляции; Другое
es: Estado del aislamiento: Con aislamiento; Sin aislamiento; Otros
sv: Isoleringsstatus: Isolerad; Oisolerad; Övrigt
pl: Status izolacji: Izolowane; Nieizolowane; Pozostałe
en: Insulation status: Insulated; Non-insulated; Other
nb: Isolasjonsstatus: Isolert; Uisolert; Annet
ja: 断熱状態: 断熱; 非断熱; その他
ko: 단열 여부: 단열 처리; 비절연; 기타
lt-LT: Izoliacijos buvimas: Pašiltinta; Be pašiltinimo; Kita
sk-SK: Stav izolácie: Izolované; Neizolované; Iné